Delaware, session 153, SB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. The portion of Route 24 known as the Millsboro Bypass is hereby designated and shall be known as the âSenator Richard S. Cordrey Bypass.â Section 2. The Department of Transportation shall erect suitable signs along the bypass to indicate its name.